Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.065

Additional duties of legislative service center.

The legislative service center, under the direction of the joint legislative systems administrative committee, shall:

(1) Develop a legislative information technology portfolio consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.105.341;

(2) Participate in the development of an enterprise-based statewide information technology strategy;

(3) Ensure the legislative information technology portfolio is organized and structured to clearly indicate participation in and use of enterprise-wide information technology strategies;

(4) As part of the biennial budget process, submit the legislative information technology portfolio to the chair and ranking member of the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the office of financial management, and Washington technology solutions.

[ 2024 c 54 s 55; 2020 c 114 s 13; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 411; 2015 c 225 s 96; 2010 c 282 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 401-405, 409, 411, and 412: See note following RCW 2.36.057.